Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-1239
Nebraska Investment Council; purpose; members; meetings; compensation; expenses.

The purpose of the council is to formulate and establish such policies as it may deem necessary and proper which shall govern the methods, practices, and procedures followed by the state investment officer for the investment or reinvestment of state funds and funds described in section 83-133 and the purchase, sale, or exchange of securities as provided by the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. The council shall meet from time to time as directed by the Governor or the chairperson or as requested by the state investment officer. The members of the council, except the State Treasurer and the executive director of the Nebraska Public Employees Retirement Systems, shall be paid seventy-five dollars per diem. The members shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in connection with the performance of their duties as members as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 3, p. 2350;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 145;

Laws 1985, LB 335, § 1;

Laws 1991, LB 368, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 847, § 20;

Laws 1997, LB 4, § 1;

Laws 2005, LB 503, § 6;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 3;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 79;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 14.
July 18, 2026
Class V School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-978.01.